Nebraska, session 109, LB1124.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1124 LB1124
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 77-2602, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-2602 (1)(a) The Legislature finds that:
(i) The State of Nebraska spends in excess of one hundred twenty
million dollars annually in medicaid expenses related to cancer, disease,
and illness caused by smoking;
(ii) Smoking related cancer, disease, and illness are preventable;
and
(iii) Medicaid costs paid by taxpayers account for more than twenty
percent of the State of Nebraska's General Fund appropriations and
continue to increase.
(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to direct a portion of the
cigarette tax revenue to be used for the purposes of medicaid.
(2) (1) Every stamping agent engaged in distributing or selling
cigarettes at wholesale in this state shall pay to the Tax Commissioner
of this state a special privilege tax. This shall be in addition to all
other taxes. It shall be paid prior to or at the time of the sale, gift,
or delivery to the retail dealer in the several amounts as follows: On
each package of cigarettes containing not more than twenty cigarettes,
one dollar and sixty-four cents per package; and on packages containing
more than twenty cigarettes, the same tax as provided on packages
containing not more than twenty cigarettes for the first twenty
cigarettes in each package and a tax of one-twentieth of the tax on the
first twenty cigarettes on each cigarette in excess of twenty cigarettes
in each package.
(3) (2) Beginning July 1, 2026 October 1, 2004, the State Treasurer
shall place the equivalent of fifty-two forty-nine cents of such tax in
the General Fund. For purposes of this section, the equivalent of a
specified number of cents of the tax shall mean that portion of the
proceeds of the tax equal to the specified number divided by the tax rate
per package of cigarettes containing not more than twenty cigarettes.
-2-

LB1124 LB1124
2026 2026
(4) (3) The State Treasurer shall distribute the remaining proceeds
of such tax as follows:
(a) Beginning July 1, 1980, the State Treasurer shall place the
equivalent of one cent of such tax in the Nebraska Outdoor Recreation
Development Cash Fund. For fiscal year distributions occurring after
FY1998-99, the distribution under this subdivision shall not be less than
the amount distributed under this subdivision for FY1997-98. Any money
needed to increase the amount distributed under this subdivision to the
FY1997-98 amount shall reduce the distribution to the General Fund;
(b) Beginning July 1, 1993, the State Treasurer shall place the
equivalent of three cents of such tax in the Health and Human Services
Cash Fund to carry out sections 81-637 to 81-640. For fiscal year
distributions occurring after FY1998-99, the distribution under this
subdivision shall not be less than the amount distributed under this
subdivision for FY1997-98. Any money needed to increase the amount
distributed under this subdivision to the FY1997-98 amount shall reduce
the distribution to the General Fund;
(c) Beginning October 1, 2002, and continuing until all the purposes
of the Deferred Building Renewal Act have been fulfilled, the State
Treasurer shall place the equivalent of seven cents of such tax in the
Building Renewal Allocation Fund. The distribution under this subdivision
shall not be less than the amount distributed under this subdivision for
FY1997-98. Any money needed to increase the amount distributed under this
subdivision to the FY1997-98 amount shall reduce the distribution to the
General Fund;
(d) Beginning July 1, 2016, and every fiscal year thereafter, the
State Treasurer shall place the equivalent of three million eight hundred
twenty thousand dollars of such tax in the Nebraska Public Safety
Communication System Cash Fund. If necessary, the State Treasurer shall
reduce the distribution of tax proceeds to the General Fund pursuant to
subsection (3) (2) of this section by such amount required to fulfill the
-3-

LB1124 LB1124
2026 2026
distribution pursuant to this subdivision; and
(e) Beginning July 1, 2026 2016, and every fiscal year thereafter,
the State Treasurer shall place the equivalent of ninety-seven cents of
such tax plus an additional one million two hundred fifty thousand
dollars of such tax in the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund. If necessary,
the State Treasurer shall reduce the distribution of tax proceeds to the
General Fund pursuant to subsection (3) (2) of this section by such
amount required to fulfill the distribution pursuant to this subdivision.
The amount that is equivalent to ninety-seven cents of such tax shall be
used for purposes of medicaid.
(5) (4) If, after distributing the proceeds of such tax pursuant to
subsections (3) (2) and (4) (3) of this section, any proceeds of such tax
remain, the State Treasurer shall place such remainder in the Nebraska
Capital Construction Fund.
(6) (5) The Legislature hereby finds and determines that the
projects funded from the Building Renewal Allocation Fund are of critical
importance to the State of Nebraska. It is the intent of the Legislature
that the allocations and appropriations made by the Legislature to such
fund not be reduced until all contracts and securities relating to the
construction and financing of the projects or portions of the projects
funded from such fund are completed or paid, and that until such time any
reductions in the cigarette tax rate made by the Legislature shall be
simultaneously accompanied by equivalent reductions in the amount
dedicated to the General Fund from cigarette tax revenue. Any provision
made by the Legislature for distribution of the proceeds of the cigarette
tax for projects or programs other than those to (a) the General Fund,
(b) the Nebraska Outdoor Recreation Development Cash Fund, (c) the Health
and Human Services Cash Fund, (d) the Building Renewal Allocation Fund,
(e) the Nebraska Public Safety Communication System Cash Fund, and (f)
the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund shall not be made a higher priority
than or an equal priority to any of the programs or projects specified in
-4-

LB1124 LB1124
2026 2026
subdivisions (a) through (f) of this subsection.
Sec. 2. This act becomes operative on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 3. Original section 77-2602, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
Sec. 4. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-5-